Utah statutes.
4-36-6.   Disposition of money from compact insurance fund.

The department, agency, or officer expending or becoming liable for an expenditure on account of a control or eradication program undertaken or intensified under this compact shall have credited to the appropriate account in the state treasury the amount of any payments made to this state to defray the cost of the program, or any part thereof, or as reimbursement thereof.



Enacted by Chapter 191, 1985 General Session

